src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N_KEL1 !!= * @CODE@ кель:кель %^Ь2ZERO
! harmony: front
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KEL1 ;
@P.POS.N@+Der/Dimin:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е%{frontSoft%} NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_PEJ !!= * @CODE@ кель:кель %^Ь2ZERO
! harmony: front
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_PEJ ;
@P.POS.N@+Der/Dimin:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е%{frontSoft%} NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_TYL
! harmony: front
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@%{frontHard%} NMN_KAL ;
@P.POS.N@+Der/Dimin:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е%{frontSoft%} NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

!LEXICON N_KAL_SUB
!+Use/NG+Err/Orth: N_KAL ;

LEXICON N_KAL-PL
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@%{backHard%} NMN_DEF-PL-DECLENSION ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@%{backHard%} _KAL-Indef-Declension-PL ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@%{backHard%} N_KAL-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;

!LEXICON N_LAV-PL
!@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@%{back%} NMN_DEF-PL-DECLENSION ;
!@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@%{back%} _KAL-Indef-Declension-PL ;
!@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@%{back%} N_KAL-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;

!LEXICON N_TEV-PL
!@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@%{frontSoft%} NMN_DEF-PL-DECLENSION ;
!@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@%{frontSoft%} _KAL-Indef-Declension-PL ;
!@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@%{frontSoft%} N_KAL-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;

LEXICON N_KEL1-PL
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@%{frontSoft%} NMN_DEF-PL-DECLENSION ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@%{frontSoft%} _KAL-Indef-Declension-PL ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@%{frontSoft%} N_KAL-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;

!LEXICON N_PEJ-PL
!@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@%{frontSoft%} NMN_DEF-PL-DECLENSION ;
!@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@%{frontSoft%} _KAL-Indef-Declension-PL ;
!@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@%{frontSoft%} N_KAL-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;

!LEXICON N_KAL-PL_SUB
!+Use/NG+Err/Orth: N_KAL-PL ;

LEXICON N_LAK
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_LAK ;
@P.POS.N@+Der/Dimin:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е%{frontSoft%} NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_LAK-PL
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_DEF-PL-DECLENSION ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ _KAL-Indef-Declension-PL ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ N_KAL-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;

LEXICON N_KIT
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KIT ;
@P.POS.N@+Der/Dimin:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е%{frontSoft%} NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_KIT-PL
!2013-03-15!+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Orth/PhonInfl+N:%>TLoss NMN_DEF-PL-DECLENSION ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ _KIT-Indef-Declension ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ N_KAL-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;

LEXICON N_KLASS
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KLASS ;
@P.POS.N@+Der/Dimin:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е%{frontSoft%} NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

!LEXICON N_OSH_SUB
!+Use/NG+Err/Orth: N_OSH ;

LEXICON N_OSH
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@+Der/Dimin:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е%{frontSoft%} NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@+Use/SpellNoSugg:@P.POS.N@ CMP-INDEF ;
@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_OSH-PL
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ N_OSH-Derivation ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_DEF-PL-DECLENSION ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ _OSH-Indef-Declension-PL ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ N_OSH-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;

LEXICON N_OZKS-PL
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ N_OSH-Derivation ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_DEF-PL-DECLENSION ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ _OSH-Indef-Declension-PL ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ N_OSH-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;

LEXICON N_LEVKS-PL
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ N_OSH-Derivation ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_DEF-PL-DECLENSION ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ _OSH-Indef-Declension-PL ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ N_OSH-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;

LEXICON N_KENKSH
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@+Der/Dimin:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е%{frontSoft%} NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@+Use/SpellNoSugg:@P.POS.N@ CMP-INDEF ;
@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_LESHCH
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@+Der/Dimin:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е%{frontSoft%} NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@+Use/SpellNoSugg:@P.POS.N@ CMP-INDEF ;
@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_PLASHCH
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@+Der/Dimin:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е%{frontSoft%} NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@+Use/SpellNoSugg:@P.POS.N@ CMP-INDEF ;
@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;


LEXICON N_OZKS
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@+Der/Dimin:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е%{frontSoft%} NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@+Use/SpellNoSugg:@P.POS.N@ CMP-INDEF ;
@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_KARDAZ !! кардаз:карда
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@+Der/Dimin:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е%{frontSoft%} NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@+Use/SpellNoSugg:@P.POS.N@ CMP-INDEF ;
@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_LEVKS
! harmony: front
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@+Der/Dimin:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е%{frontSoft%} NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@+Use/SpellNoSugg:@P.POS.N@ CMP-INDEF ;
@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_ROZ1
! harmony: front
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@+Der/Dimin:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е%{frontSoft%} NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@+Use/SpellNoSugg:@P.POS.N@ CMP-INDEF ;
@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_IE
:е N_VELE ;
@U.CX.NOM@+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Pl+Nom+Indef:@U.CX.NOM@йть K ;
@P.POS.N@+Use/NG+Err/Orth:@P.POS.N@й NMN_DEF-PL-DECLENSION ;
@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_LAVSHO
@P.POS.N@+Use/NG:@P.POS.N@%{backHard%} NMN_TINGE-SHORT-FORMS ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@о%{back%} NMN_TINGE-LONG-FORMS ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@о%{back%} NMN_TINGE-OTHER-FORMS ;
!@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_CHUVTO ;
@P.POS.N@+Der/Dimin:@P.POS.N@е%>Н1е%{frontSoft%} NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_KECHE
@P.POS.N@+Use/NG:@P.POS.N@%{frontHard%} NMN_TINGE-SHORT-FORMS ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@е%{frontSoft%} NMN_TINGE-LONG-FORMS ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@е%{frontSoft%} NMN_TINGE-OTHER-FORMS ;
!@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_TESHTE ;
@P.POS.N@+Der/Dimin:@P.POS.N@е%>Н1е%{frontSoft%} NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_KENZHE
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@%{frontHard%} NMN_TINGE-SHORT-FORMS ;
@P.POS.N@+Use/NG:@P.POS.N@е%{frontSoft%} NMN_TINGE-LONG-FORMS ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@е%{frontSoft%} NMN_TINGE-OTHER-FORMS ;
!@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_TESHTE ;
@P.POS.N@+Der/Dimin:@P.POS.N@е%>Н1е%{frontSoft%} NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_TESHTE
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@%{frontSoft%} NMN_TINGE-SHORT-FORMS ;
@P.POS.N@+Use/NG:@P.POS.N@%^Ь2ZEROе%{frontSoft%} NMN_TINGE-LONG-FORMS ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@%^Ь2ZEROе%{frontSoft%} NMN_TINGE-OTHER-FORMS ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_TESHTE ;
@P.POS.N@+Der/Dimin:@P.POS.N@%^Ь2ZEROи%>Н1е%{frontSoft%} NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_TINGE
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@%{frontSoft%} NMN_TINGE-SHORT-FORMS ;
@P.POS.N@+Use/NG:@P.POS.N@е%{frontSoft%} NMN_TINGE-LONG-FORMS ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@е%{frontSoft%} NMN_TINGE-OTHER-FORMS ;
@P.POS.N@+Der/Dimin:@P.POS.N@е%>Н1е%{frontSoft%} NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_TINGE-PL
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_DEF-PL-DECLENSION ;
@P.POS.N@+Use/NG:@P.POS.N@е NMN_DEF-PL-DECLENSION ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ _PANGO-Indef-Declension-PL ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ N_KUDO-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;

LEXICON N_CHUVTO
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@%{backHard%} NMN_TINGE-SHORT-FORMS ;
@P.POS.N@+Use/NG:@P.POS.N@о%{back%} NMN_TINGE-LONG-FORMS ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@о%{back%} NMN_TINGE-OTHER-FORMS ;
!@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_CHUVTO ;
@P.POS.N@+Der/Dimin:@P.POS.N@ы%>Н1е%{frontSoft%} NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_PANGO
!! панго:панг
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@%{back%} NMN_TINGE-SHORT-FORMS ;
!@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@%{ОØ%} NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@+Use/NG:@P.POS.N@о NMN_TINGE-LONG-FORMS ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@о NMN_TINGE-OTHER-FORMS ;
@P.POS.N@+Der/Dimin:@P.POS.N@и%>Н1е%{frontSoft%} NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@:@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@о LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON DV-N_
+V+Der+Der/OmA: N_KUDO ;

! This might be moved to exceptions 2012-11-21
LEXICON N_KI
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KI ;
@P.POS.N@+Der/Dimin:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е%{frontSoft%} NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;

LEXICON N_VELE_IS-KE-DIM
!! Front vowel, non-palatal consonant before vowel
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KUDO ;
LEXICON N_VELE_IS-NE-DIM
!! Front vowel, non-palatal consonant before vowel
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KUDO ;
LEXICON N_VELE
!! Front vowel, non-palatal consonant before vowel
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@+Der/Dimin:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е%{frontSoft%} NMN_KUDO ;
@P.POS.N@@U.DECL-NX.SP@ LAT-INDEF ;
