src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON nouns
алиментт:алимент N_KIT-PL  "elatusapu" ;
билетке:билетке N_VELE_IS-KE-DIM  "" ;
благодетель:благодетель N_KEL1  "" ;
буровик:буровик N_LAK  "" ;
бутыл:бутыл N_TYL  "" ;
вайгельсант:вайгель#сан N_KAL-PL  "" ;
вармасёлмо:варма#сёлм N_PANGO  "" ;
варштавт:варштавт N_KIT  "" ;
васоньпеельть:васоньпеель N_KAL-PL  "" ;
вашине:вашине N_VELE_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
ведьме:ведьме N_VELE  "hihna" ;
ведьпанкске:ведь#панкске N_VELE_IS-KE-DIM  "" ;
ведьпеште:ведьпешть N_TESHTE  "" ;
великс:великс N_OSH  "" ;
вензель:вензель N_KEL1  "" ;
верьнешке:верь#нешк N_TINGE  "" ;
вешевкс:вешевкс N_LEVKS  "" ;
вигинепейть:вигинепей N_KAL-PL  "" ;
горизонталь:горизонталь N_KEL1  "" ;
гыл:гыл N_TYL  "" ;
дневник:дневник N_LAK  "päiväkirja" ;
дробат:дробат N_KIT  "" ;
дулапотмо:дулапотм N_PANGO  "" ;
игореве:игореве N_VELE  "" ;
ие:и N_IE  "vuosi" ;
изырьбель:изырьбель N_KEL1  "" ;
ильведевкс:ильведевкс N_LEVKS  "virhe" ;
инфразвук:инфразвук N_LAK  "" ;
ишмеэльде:ишмеэльдь N_TESHTE  "" ;
каворне:каворне N_VELE_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
каворьске:каворьске N_VELE_IS-KE-DIM  "" ;
канзёркс:канзёркс N_OSH  "" ;
карязт:каряз N_OSH-PL  "" ;
каткалевкс:катка#левкс N_LEVKS  "" ;
кевпинге:кев#пинг N_TINGE  "" ;
кедьпеште:кедьпешть N_TESHTE  "" ;
кенкшкурго:кенкш#кург N_PANGO  "" ;
керямот:керямот N_KIT  "(mon.) otsatukka" ;
ки:ки N_KI  "koi" ;
кивге:кивге N_VELE  "" ;
кирдема:кирдема DV-N_  "kärsivällisyys" ;
кискаваце:киска#ваць N_TESHTE  "" ;
кискалевкс:киска#левкс N_LEVKS  "" ;
киштипильге:киштипильг N_TINGE  "" ;
конёк:конёк N_LAK  "" ;
коптирькс:коптирькс N_OSH  "" ;
котыне:котыне N_VELE_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
коцтке:коцтке N_VELE_IS-KE-DIM  "" ;
куколь:куколь N_KEL1  "" ;
латкочувто:латкочувт N_PANGO  "" ;
лауреат:лауреат N_KIT  "laureaatti" ;
лезэвчи:лезэвчи N_VELE  "" ;
лик:лик N_LAK  "" ;
лияназсэльге:лияназсэльг N_TINGE  "" ;
лёмзёркс:лёмзёркс N_OSH  "tuomi" ;
меелькст:меелькс N_OSH-PL  "" ;
мекшке:мекшке N_VELE_IS-KE-DIM  "" ;
мелькть:мельк N_TINGE-PL  "(mon.) keuhkot" ;
мельне:мельне N_VELE_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
модапеште:модапешть N_TESHTE  "" ;
мызыл:мызыл N_TYL  "" ;
наводчик:наводчик N_LAK  "suuntaaja" ;
нармуньлевкс:нармунь#левкс N_LEVKS  "" ;
нерявкст:нерявкс N_OSH-PL  "oraat" ;
нешке:нешк N_TINGE  "mehiläispesä" ;
нешкепире:нешке#пире N_VELE  "mehiläistarha" ;
ногот:ногот N_KIT  "" ;
ноготт:ногот N_KIT-PL  "" ;
ноль:ноль N_KEL1  "nolla" ;
нулко:нулк N_PANGO  "rähmä (silmässä)" ;
олгопакш:олго#пакш N_OSH  "" ;
панарт:панар N_KAL-PL  "" ;
парсейне:парсейне N_VELE_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
пастухке:пастухке N_VELE_IS-KE-DIM  "paimenpoika" ;
пелькакенже:пелька#кенж N_TINGE  "" ;
пельсвачочи:пельсвачочи N_VELE  "" ;
пизёлчувто:пизёл#чувт N_PANGO  "" ;
пилепоте:пиле#поть N_TESHTE  "" ;
пинеме#пулокст:пинеме#пулокс N_OSH-PL  "" ;
пистолет:пистолет N_KIT  "pistooli" ;
поляныне:поляныне N_VELE_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
помоч:помоч N_OSH  "" ;
поремапель:порема#пель N_KEL1  "" ;
посаломщык:посаломщык N_LAK  "" ;
прогресс:прогресс N_KLASS  "edistys" ;
пулокст:пулокс N_OSH-PL  "" ;
пупсевкс:пупсевкс N_LEVKS  "" ;
раське:раськ N_TINGE  "suku" ;
рецензент:рецензент N_KIT  "" ;
рогапеште:рогапешть N_TESHTE  "" ;
розьпулокст:розь#пулокс N_OSH-PL  "" ;
скамикаудалкс:скамикаудалкс N_OSH  "" ;
следователь:следователь N_KEL1  "tutkintatuomari" ;
сокст:сокс N_OSH-PL  "" ;
справочник:справочник N_LAK  "käsikirja" ;
столанго:столанг N_PANGO  "" ;
судке:судке N_VELE_IS-KE-DIM  "" ;
сукалевкс:сукалевкс N_LEVKS  "" ;
сьвет:сьвет N_KIT  "" ;
сюконьчи:сюконьчи N_VELE  "" ;
сюровидьме:сюровидьм N_TINGE  "" ;
тазт:таз N_OSH-PL  "syyhy" ;
толгине:толгине N_VELE_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
тустт:туст N_KIT-PL  "" ;
умапанкс:умапанкс N_OSH  "" ;
умарьчувто:умарь#чувт N_PANGO  "" ;
хрусталь:хрусталь N_KEL1  "kristalli" ;
цяпорарт:цяпорарт N_KIT  "" ;
цёлак:цёлак N_LAK  "kehno" ;
чамаумарть:чамаумарь N_KAL-PL  "" ;
чевсиндевкс:чев#синдевкс N_LEVKS  "" ;
чиярмакт:чи#ярмак N_LAK-PL  "" ;
чувтке:чувтке N_VELE_IS-KE-DIM  "" ;
шахматт:шахмат N_KIT-PL  "" ;
эльде:эльдь N_TESHTE  "tamma" ;
эрьмине:эрьмине N_VELE_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
эсминец:эсминец N_OSH  "hävittäjäalus" ;
ёжовтомочи:ёжовтомочи N_VELE  "" ;
